Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.125

Private practice of law—Special assistant attorney generals.

Special assistant attorney generals [attorneys general] employed on less than a full time basis to transact business of a legal or quasi legal nature for the state, such assistants and attorneys may practice law in their private capacity as attorney.

[ 1973 c 43 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 43: See note following RCW 43.10.010.